Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.360

Examinations.

(1) The examination for an architect's certificate of registration shall be held at least annually at such time and place as the board determines.

(2) The board shall determine the content, scope, and grading process of the examination. The board may adopt an appropriate national examination and grading procedure.

(3) Applicants who fail to pass any section of the examination shall be permitted to retake the parts failed as prescribed by the board. Applicants shall pass all sections of the examination as prescribed by the board.

(4) Applicants for registration may begin taking the examination upon enrollment in a structured training program as approved by the board.

[ 2024 c 49 s 1; 2019 c 67 s 4; 2010 c 129 s 6; 1985 c 37 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 49: "This act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2024 c 49 s 2.]